Hawaii statutes.
[§346-55.1] Visitation, custody, and
support when public assistance paid. Whenever public assistance is paid to
or for the benefit of any dependent child, the existence or enforcement of a
duty of support owed by a noncustodial parent to such child shall not be
affected by a failure or refusal by the custodial parent to implement any right
as to custody or visitation granted by a court to the noncustodial parent. [L
1983, c 66, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next